dict/fj_FJ.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aiukvotelrsnmbdcwygqpjfhSLMKTANVJBWRICEPYDFOQUG

PFX A Y 12
PFX A 0 ca [bq][eou]
PFX A 0 ca [ct]a
PFX A 0 ca dr
PFX A 0 ca g[au]
PFX A 0 ca i[dt]
PFX A 0 ca k[aiu]
PFX A 0 ca l[aio]
PFX A 0 ca m[ae]
PFX A 0 ca r[aiou]
PFX A 0 ca u[dlt]
PFX A 0 ca v[aeiu]
PFX A 0 ca w[aei]

PFX B Y 7
PFX B 0 ce [bl][eu]
PFX B 0 ce [cr]e
PFX B 0 ce dr
PFX B 0 ce gu
PFX B 0 ce [kv][au]
PFX B 0 ce m[ou]
PFX B 0 ce ul

PFX C Y 12
PFX C 0 co [bv][aiou]
PFX C 0 co co
PFX C 0 co d[eru]
PFX C 0 co ga
PFX C 0 co ir
PFX C 0 co k[aio]
PFX C 0 co l[aeou]
PFX C 0 co m[ao]
PFX C 0 co ni
PFX C 0 co [qw][ai]
PFX C 0 co r[io]
PFX C 0 co se

PFX D Y 12
PFX D 0 da [bl][aeiou]
PFX D 0 da d[aor]
PFX D 0 da [gr][aeo]
PFX D 0 da i[lnr]
PFX D 0 da k[aiou]
PFX D 0 da [mv][aeou]
PFX D 0 da n[iu]
PFX D 0 da [qy]a
PFX D 0 da s[ei]
PFX D 0 da t[ou]
PFX D 0 da u[crt]
PFX D 0 da w[ae]

PFX E N 11
PFX E 0 dau b[aiou]
PFX E 0 dau [ct][aeu]
PFX E 0 dau d[aor]
PFX E 0 dau k[aeoiu]
PFX E 0 dau [lr][ao]
PFX E 0 dau m[ae]
PFX E 0 dau n[au]
PFX E 0 dau q[io]
PFX E 0 dau s[aeio]
PFX E 0 dau v[aeou]
PFX E 0 dau [wy]a

PFX F Y 10
PFX F 0 i a[gpuv]
PFX F 0 i [bcklmnqrstv][aeiou]
PFX F 0 i d[aeioru]
PFX F 0 i e[iku]
PFX F 0 i [fy]a
PFX F 0 i i[ls]
PFX F 0 i o[bklnrstuv]
PFX F 0 i p[au]
PFX F 0 i u[abcdiklmnrstv]
PFX F 0 i w[aei]

PFX G Y 8
PFX G 0 ka [bklmstv][aeiou]
PFX G 0 ka c[aiu]
PFX G 0 ka d[aioru]
PFX G 0 ka i[bdklmnoqstvy]
PFX G 0 ka [nj]i
PFX G 0 ka [pqw]a
PFX G 0 ka r[aiou]
PFX G 0 ka u[aknt]

PFX H N 9
PFX H 0 kaka b[aeou]
PFX H 0 kaka d[aior]
PFX H 0 kaka i[sv]
PFX H 0 kaka l[aou]
PFX H 0 kaka m[eu]
PFX H 0 kaka ra
PFX H 0 kaka s[eo]
PFX H 0 kaka t[eiu]
PFX H 0 kaka v[aiou]

PFX I Y 9
PFX I 0 ke [ckt]e
PFX I 0 ke d[ar]
PFX I 0 ke [fn]i
PFX I 0 ke i[mort]
PFX I 0 ke l[ei]
PFX I 0 ke m[aeiu]
PFX I 0 ke [qs][au]
PFX I 0 ke r[eiu]
PFX I 0 ke v[ae]

PFX J N 12
PFX J 0 lau al
PFX J 0 lau [bckqv][aiou]
PFX J 0 lau d[ioru]
PFX J 0 lau g[au]
PFX J 0 lau l[ae]
PFX J 0 lau m[io]
PFX J 0 lau [nwy]a
PFX J 0 lau pu
PFX J 0 lau r[aeou]
PFX J 0 lau s[aeu]
PFX J 0 lau t[aeiou]
PFX J 0 lau u[al]

PFX K Y 12
PFX K 0 ma [bj]i
PFX K 0 ma c[aeo]
PFX K 0 ma d[aeioru]
PFX K 0 ma i[cklmnrstv]
PFX K 0 ma [klnrs][aeiou]
PFX K 0 ma [mv][aou]
PFX K 0 ma o[qu]
PFX K 0 ma po
PFX K 0 ma q[eu]
PFX K 0 ma t[aeou]
PFX K 0 ma u[aelstvw]
PFX K 0 ma [wy]a

PFX L N 7
PFX L 0 mala d[ar]
PFX L 0 mala iv
PFX L 0 mala [mtw]a
PFX L 0 mala nu
PFX L 0 mala ri
PFX L 0 mala s[eo]
PFX L 0 mala v[io]

PFX M Y 9
PFX M 0 no be
PFX M 0 no [ckv][ai]
PFX M 0 no d[aor]
PFX M 0 no [gnpy]a
PFX M 0 no i[ctv]
PFX M 0 no l[aeo]
PFX M 0 no [ms][aeu]
PFX M 0 no q[au]
PFX M 0 no t[aio]

PFX N Y 12
PFX N 0 ra b[eou]
PFX N 0 ra [cqw]a
PFX N 0 ra g[ou]
PFX N 0 ra i[cklmstvy]
PFX N 0 ra [kmr][au]
PFX N 0 ra l[aeu]
PFX N 0 ra on
PFX N 0 ra p[aiu]
PFX N 0 ra s[ei]
PFX N 0 ra t[aio]
PFX N 0 ra u[ckmt]
PFX N 0 ra v[aiou]

PFX O Y 12
PFX O 0 sa [bk][aeiou]
PFX O 0 sa [gs]a
PFX O 0 sa i[sv]
PFX O 0 sa [jt]i
PFX O 0 sa l[aiou]
PFX O 0 sa [mq][aio]
PFX O 0 sa n[iou]
PFX O 0 sa po
PFX O 0 sa r[aeo]
PFX O 0 sa u[cklmnt]
PFX O 0 sa v[aeu]
PFX O 0 sa w[ae]

PFX P Y 10
PFX P 0 sau bu
PFX P 0 sau c[ai]
PFX P 0 sau d[air]
PFX P 0 sau go
PFX P 0 sau [km][aou]
PFX P 0 sau l[aeio]
PFX P 0 sau [qw][ae]
PFX P 0 sau r[aiu]
PFX P 0 sau [sty]a
PFX P 0 sau v[aiou]

PFX Q Y 15
PFX Q 0 so a[in]
PFX Q 0 so b[eu]
PFX Q 0 so [cq]o
PFX Q 0 so dr
PFX Q 0 so ga
PFX Q 0 so is
PFX Q 0 so [jn]i
PFX Q 0 so [km][aiou]
PFX Q 0 so l[aeio]
PFX Q 0 so pu
PFX Q 0 so r[aou]
PFX Q 0 so s[eio]
PFX Q 0 so [tw][ai]
PFX Q 0 so ur
PFX Q 0 so v[aeiu]

PFX R Y 12
PFX R 0 ta [bcklqrtv][aeiou]
PFX R 0 ta d[aeior]
PFX R 0 ta [ey]a
PFX R 0 ta [gm][aeou]
PFX R 0 ta i[eklnrsvy]
PFX R 0 ta ji
PFX R 0 ta n[eio]
PFX R 0 ta o[kn]
PFX R 0 ta p[iu]
PFX R 0 ta s[aeio]
PFX R 0 ta u[abclmnrsv]
PFX R 0 ta w[ai]

PFX S N 12
PFX S 0 tabu c[aeu]
PFX S 0 tabu d[ar]
PFX S 0 tabu gu
PFX S 0 tabu is
PFX S 0 tabu k[aeo]
PFX S 0 tabu [lv][aou]
PFX S 0 tabu m[ou]
PFX S 0 tabu qi
PFX S 0 tabu r[ai]
PFX S 0 tabu s[aeio]
PFX S 0 tabu t[aeou]
PFX S 0 tabu [wy]a

PFX T Y 8
PFX T 0 tala bi
PFX T 0 tala dr
PFX T 0 tala id
PFX T 0 tala le
PFX T 0 tala [mn]o
PFX T 0 tala [rtwy]a
PFX T 0 tala s[ei]
PFX T 0 tala vu

PFX U Y 13
PFX U 0 tata b[aeiou]
PFX U 0 tata c[aeio]
PFX U 0 tata d[ior]
PFX U 0 tata g[eu]
PFX U 0 tata iy
PFX U 0 tata [kt][aiu]
PFX U 0 tata l[aiou]
PFX U 0 tata [mv][aeou]
PFX U 0 tata pi
PFX U 0 tata q[aeiu]
PFX U 0 tata s[eio]
PFX U 0 tata u[crt]
PFX U 0 tata [wy]a

PFX V Y 13
PFX V 0 tau ak
PFX V 0 tau b[aei]
PFX V 0 tau c[aio]
PFX V 0 tau d[aou]
PFX V 0 tau ge
PFX V 0 tau i[ltv]
PFX V 0 tau k[eu]
PFX V 0 tau [ltv][aiou]
PFX V 0 tau m[aeu]
PFX V 0 tau [nwy]a
PFX V 0 tau on
PFX V 0 tau r[au]
PFX V 0 tau s[ou]

PFX W N 11
PFX W 0 tawa [bgn]u
PFX W 0 tawa c[ai]
PFX W 0 tawa d[ou]
PFX W 0 tawa i[kst]
PFX W 0 tawa ki
PFX W 0 tawa l[ao]
PFX W 0 tawa m[au]
PFX W 0 tawa [ry]a
PFX W 0 tawa s[aei]
PFX W 0 tawa t[au]
PFX W 0 tawa v[aeu]

PFX X Y 15
PFX X 0 va b[iu]
PFX X 0 va [cs][aeiu]
PFX X 0 va d[aru]
PFX X 0 va ev
PFX X 0 va g[aeou]
PFX X 0 va i[abcdklstv]
PFX X 0 va [kq][aeiou]
PFX X 0 va l[aeu]
PFX X 0 va m[ae]
PFX X 0 va n[ai]
PFX X 0 va o[lns]
PFX X 0 va [rv][aei]
PFX X 0 va t[aeu]
PFX X 0 va uc
PFX X 0 va we

PFX Y Y 10
PFX Y 0 vaka am
PFX Y 0 vaka [bclmnrstv][aeiou]
PFX Y 0 vaka d[aeioru]
PFX Y 0 vaka [fj]i
PFX Y 0 vaka i[bcdkloprstuvy]
PFX Y 0 vaka p[aio]
PFX Y 0 vaka o[cginpqrstvy]
PFX Y 0 vaka u[acdgkmnrst]
PFX Y 0 vaka w[aei]
PFX Y 0 vaka ya

PFX Z Y 9
PFX Z 0 vakata bu
PFX Z 0 vakata [cqw]a
PFX Z 0 vakata d[ior]
PFX Z 0 vakata k[aeio]
PFX Z 0 vakata [lmv][aeu]
PFX Z 0 vakata r[io]
PFX Z 0 vakata s[iou]
PFX Z 0 vakata t[aiou]
PFX Z 0 vakata uc

PFX 0 Y 10
PFX 0 0 vei au
PFX 0 0 vei [bcklmnqstv][aeiou]
PFX 0 0 vei d[aeioru]
PFX 0 0 vei fe
PFX 0 0 vei [gjpy]a
PFX 0 0 vei i[klr]
PFX 0 0 vei o[kps]
PFX 0 0 vei r[aiou]
PFX 0 0 vei u[abklst]
PFX 0 0 vei w[ae]

PFX 1 Y 10
PFX 1 0 wa [blsv][aeiou]
PFX 1 0 wa [cm][aeio]
PFX 1 0 wa d[aeru]
PFX 1 0 wa [gwy]a
PFX 1 0 wa i[abcgklmnstv]
PFX 1 0 wa [kr][aiou]
PFX 1 0 wa no
PFX 1 0 wa ov
PFX 1 0 wa q[aio]
PFX 1 0 wa u[lv]

PFX 2 Y 13
PFX 2 0 ya b[aei]
PFX 2 0 ya c[aeio]
PFX 2 0 ya d[ru]
PFX 2 0 ya g[aio]
PFX 2 0 ya is
PFX 2 0 ya [krv][aiou]
PFX 2 0 ya [lt][aeiou]
PFX 2 0 ya m[aeou]
PFX 2 0 ya n[ai]
PFX 2 0 ya on
PFX 2 0 ya po
PFX 2 0 ya [qswy]a
PFX 2 0 ya u[aeknt]

SFX a Y 5
SFX a 0 ca [bcdgiklmnqrstuvwy]a
SFX a 0 ca [blmnrtvw]e
SFX a 0 ca [abdgklmnoqrtuv]i
SFX a 0 ca [abcgklmnrtv]o
SFX a 0 ca [abcegklmnopqrstv]u

SFX b Y 5
SFX b 0 ci [bdiklruvw]a
SFX b 0 ci [blrv]e
SFX b 0 ci [abcgklmnorsv]i
SFX b 0 ci [bgklmnrtv]o
SFX b 0 ci [abgklorv]u

SFX c Y 5
SFX c 0 dra [cgklmnrtvw]a
SFX c 0 dra [klrtv]e
SFX c 0 dra [aklot]i
SFX c 0 dra [lmt]o
SFX c 0 dra [abklnrstv]u

SFX d Y 5
SFX d 0 drau [bcklmnqt]a
SFX d 0 drau [tv]e
SFX d 0 drau [gk]i
SFX d 0 drau [eik]o
SFX d 0 drau [acm]u

SFX e Y 5
SFX e 0 ga [dgklrstu]a
SFX e 0 ga [clrw]e
SFX e 0 ga [bcdflnrsv]i
SFX e 0 ga [acklrstv]o
SFX e 0 ga [aelrstv]u

SFX f Y 4
SFX f 0 gi [dklt]a
SFX f 0 gi [cdlorst]i
SFX f 0 gi [blrst]o
SFX f 0 gi [rs]u

SFX g Y 5
SFX g 0 ka [bcdiklmnrstuvwy]a
SFX g 0 ka [bdklnrstv]e
SFX g 0 ka [abcdeiklmnprstv]i
SFX g 0 ka [abcdklmnqrst]o
SFX g 0 ka [acdeklmnrstv]u

SFX h Y 4
SFX h 0 kaka [lrt]a
SFX h 0 kaka li
SFX h 0 kaka [lr]o
SFX h 0 kaka ru

SFX i Y 3
SFX i 0 kaki ka
SFX i 0 kaki li
SFX i 0 kaki [rv]u

SFX j Y 5
SFX j 0 ki [bcdklmnrstuvw]a
SFX j 0 ki [blmr]e
SFX j 0 ki [abklmnrst]i
SFX j 0 ki [bdlnrst]o
SFX j 0 ki [bcdilmnprstv]u

SFX k Y 5
SFX k 0 laka [bcgiklmnqrstuv]a
SFX k 0 laka [bdlqrs]e
SFX k 0 laka [abcdgklnqrstuv]i
SFX k 0 laka [bgklmnrst]o
SFX k 0 laka [acdegkmnorstv]u

SFX l Y 5
SFX l 0 laki [biknqrtuv]a
SFX l 0 laki [blqr]e
SFX l 0 laki [abcgknqrstuv]i
SFX l 0 laki [bgklnrst]o
SFX l 0 laki [acdegkmnorstv]u

SFX m Y 5
SFX m 0 ma [cklmrst]a
SFX m 0 ma [lqrs]e
SFX m 0 ma [alrst]i
SFX m 0 ma [dlqrst]o
SFX m 0 ma [acklnorst]u
