dict/fj_FJ.dic
bala/zfgsw
bera/DAY
bi/DOGVY1
bitalaki/0V
biu/TK0
biuta/T
bo/aszqftwJbgk
bolabola/UHFY
bolo/OA
bone/1C
bora/lkw
bose/g
bota/GCN
bowai/D
bu/BGtR1
buka/YA0
bula/zf
bulu/ewJ
bulubulu/wxH
buna/Z
buru/gh
butu/x5Jjtekgu8
cakaiba/E
camani/0F
caqe/FRJ0
cava/PWY1X
cavacava/YF
cavi/kul
ce/BeI
cebuya/B
cegucegu/F1
cekaceka/FU
ceva/RB
cici/Y9e
cika/G
cili/FW0
codo/m5n
coka/ckyJ
coko/CVY
como/k
cova/2QC
covu/FKJ
cudru/968S
da/fF
dagi/qa
damu/LX1G
dani/K
danui/DF
datou/IMG
davui/SP
denivuaka/C
digidigi/FZ0
diri/kJg
diridiri/HFU
dobi/b
dodo/YR
dogo/D0
doi/qc
doladola/FHU
donu/5YJ
dra/pgwH95ejmc6S
drala/h
drali/hk
dranu/m
drau/dY
drava/RY12
drekedreke/F
dresudresu/H
dri/6fpg9
drodro/FT
droka/LGY
drolo/gh
dru/G1I2B
drudru/Jke
druti/FA
dua/VY2KG1
dumu/F1JG
feno/gj
ga/CXAQDOR2
gale/OM
gesa/D
gogo/X
gone/XPN
gu/Ba
gunu/9XJS
gutu/R9J
ibo/g
ida/XA
idredre/T
idrudrudru/f
igaga/1
igudugudu/l
ika/ivwjzs
ikau/c
ikava/W
ike/K5vg
ikidakida/6b
ilala/YN
ilavo/VY
imami/I1
imasumasu/lz
iminimini/j
imulomulo/b
irau/I
iroturotu/l
isa/XG1
isau/KYRG
isivi/N
isolo/e
isuasua/l
itagitagi/b
itevutevu/j
itositosi/yl
itovo/YM
itui/1
ivakata/f
ivi/6vL
iviri/j
ivukivuki/b
iyaya/UR
ka/AC9FORGZX
kaji/X
kakaba/ZX
kakaburaki/FE
kaki/G
kako/d
kalo/O
kalou/Q1
kalu/e8x
kana/ESglkJ
kanu/m9
karaka/N
karava/jrg
kari/MO
kasaqa/X
kati/kJjl
kau/A01FXR
kavitu/F
kavudra/c
kawa/K
kele/Sc
kia/2CMGRQ1
kidaca/X
kila/XJZ
kilai/W0RZ
kilu/a8x9
kisi/6stJk9
kito/g
ko/FzC
kota/QXCK
kote/X
kotikoti/XFZ
koto/2
kovukovu/1F
kua/DFXG1
kuku/FV
kulikuli/FU
kurekure/FP
kuvu/RAB
la/CzOGWF
labo/bYa
laca/d
lafi/e
laga/DOYK
laiseni/YM
laka/rkva
lako/98Ex6
lakovi/F0
lala/eYS
lalo/FJ
lamu/GX2
lamulamu/H
lasa/mWe9p
lata/XAC2
lavo/RYG0F
lea/IBKXQ
levu/KDQCPXGJNY
lia/GRQ1YIO2
ligaqu/D
liva/AKRO2
lo/AKQ1DRW2GCV
loki/POR1K
lokiloki/FU
lolo/r9Sbam5
loto/V
lotu/xWYSE
lovi/2
lovu/C
lu/H9GS5
lumu/tgzwS
lusilusi/FHUY
lutu/ORXY
luva/RFVS
luve/crdq
luya/DZ21
ma/GZYAKNDOPRU
maca/KNY
macala/WY
mala/LKO
malamala/dq
malawa/L
mama/PK0
masi/D1X0FY
mata/cwydqah
matadra/cem
matavu/sg
mate/GYQ
mateni/E
mau/KYF0
medre/VGRY
medrolaka/Z
melamela/FU
memu/dr
mini/Jgz
misimisi/Fl
mo/CQ2
mocemoce/CF
moemoe/Y
moi/6ab
momo/bq
mu/GMNDIR2
mudou/IM
mulo/bthqar
mumuca/Q
munu/jgk
muria/VBY
musu/tSjk9g
nia/QYD2CXG
nio/rd
nisa/I
nita/OQ
niva/GRDO
oria/g
paisa/M
pala/m5gf
pisi/RN
qa/CJN1OR2G
qaqaqi/l
qara/OZ1XR
qari/PJRD
qera/RAX
qi/qvr9a
qito/sSaEx
qovi/O
qu/AKMI
qurutatena/X
qusiqusi/uF
rabe/RFJ0
raici/E0Y
raka/T1XGV2
ralevu/N
ramu/G
raraga/Y
rata/AG
ratou/GOF0
rau/w9Wmr
ravu/J0FNK
ravuta/g
rawarawa/YP
regu/bkaJ
rei/I
rere/e78
ri/AK1IR0GCX
ria/I2CXGLR
roro/FRDY
roroi/FK
roya/DCO
rua/GRVNPQY2
rubi/AFJ0I
sabi/l0J
saqa/ldJw
saroi/O
sau/ElPop
saubulu/PF
saumi/SW0
sava/I2FGS
se/G9WzH
sebulubulu/C
sei/WUKGR01
semasema/F
seo/rd
sese/FGTLYXK
seti/Q
seu/gtwk
sevusevu/F0U
si/F6zg
siga/8qSkEr
sili/r9Smfg
silima/Y
sina/UKGR
sisisi/FYZ
siti/NQ
sivote/X
so/gv8suzjw65
sokisoki/FU1
soni/e
soqo/qr9m
soso/FVQY
sou/GLF
sova/QY1KGR
su/Ic
sucuma/a
ta/AjFJKYG
tabaivola/E
tabu/ZFGPQSY
tabulotu/S
tagitagi/F
tago/FG
taka/GAKU
talaci/T0
talutu/K
tara/ZRYJ0
tarai/FSK0
tarausese/MYF
taro/96f
tasisi/Y
tatau/M0FS
tau/F0KRYUV
tavu/xiljk
tavutavu/FY
tawaisova/xW
tawaitini/xW
te/IKa
tea/K
teba/R
tebetebe/FyH
teitei/FE
tinikarua/2Y
tivu/b
todi/0FJ
toki/Jkyxl
tolu/GYV2
tolutolu/Y
tubu/uvqWs
tule/8te
tunu/cmn
tuva/krqJl
uai/G
ubiubi/F
ulaka/BOR
uma/qwka
umauma/rjz
uti/GNYO
va/BCVZYXANQDHOIPUR2G
vacu/xgljkJ
vai/KYXGPNO2
vaka/0zHr
vakabogi/Fd9
vakacalai/0
vakalomaririkotaki/0
vakasavasavataki/0
vakatubu/cas
vakavula/f
vakawaicala/Y
vakawelei/0
vakidaci/0
vakusa/FX
vala/cmyEx
vari/bk
vata/GVRBO
vatui/RFU
vatukai/a
ve/AQDOIRE
veiqaravi/E
veirabe/34lz
veiru/il4
veivacu/4lE
veni/A
veno/F
vere/EGOR
verevere/U
veta/FDI
vi/2wNL
visa/eg
vitu/2VYG
vo/DsuLab
voga/N
volisi/C
voro/Jkg
vosa/SgyajxE5
vosi/eL
votovotoa/1
vua/FBY
vui/GRAQHDO
vuki/aWtb
vulavula/YB1
vuli/aSg
vulo/hqa
vulu/PO
vuna/YRZ
vuruka/g
vuruvuru/lHi
vutu/JR2AF
waci/LOK
waika/m
waji/L
waka/NV2
wakau/D
walawa/T
walili/V
wata/NQ
wate/C
yaca/tcqu
yalo/MRY
yaqavi/0
yarua/0V
yavalati/YF0
yavu/YFVT
yavutaka/V
